ru_RU_ext.aff
# Generated Hunspell SFX rules to augment ru_RU.aff
# These rules cover word forms not generated by the original dictionary.
# Generated from 2071367 form→lemma pairs

SFX 1000 Y 25
SFX 1000 ка ек н
SFX 1000 ка ек ч
SFX 1000 ка ек т
SFX 1000 ка ек в
SFX 1000 ка ек ш
SFX 1000 ка ек р
SFX 1000 ка ек л
SFX 1000 ка ек й
SFX 1000 ка ек д
SFX 1000 ка ек ж
SFX 1000 ка ек ь
SFX 1000 ка ек с
SFX 1000 ка ек и
SFX 1000 ка ек з
SFX 1000 ка ек м
SFX 1000 ка ек п
SFX 1000 ка ек б
SFX 1000 ка ек а
SFX 1000 ка ек е
SFX 1000 ка ек у
SFX 1000 ка ек я
SFX 1000 ка ек о
SFX 1000 ка ек ы
SFX 1000 ка ек ц

SFX 1001 Y 25
SFX 1001 ка ок н
SFX 1001 ка ок ч
SFX 1001 ка ок т
SFX 1001 ка ок в
SFX 1001 ка ок ш
SFX 1001 ка ок р
SFX 1001 ка ок л
SFX 1001 ка ок й
SFX 1001 ка ок д
SFX 1001 ка ок ж
SFX 1001 ка ок ь
SFX 1001 ка ок с
SFX 1001 ка ок з
SFX 1001 ка ок м
SFX 1001 ка ок и
SFX 1001 ка ок п
SFX 1001 ка ок б
SFX 1001 ка ок а
SFX 1001 ка ок е
SFX 1001 ка ок у
SFX 1001 ка ок о
SFX 1001 ка ок я
SFX 1001 ка ок ы
SFX 1001 ка ок ц

SFX 1002 Y 21
SFX 1002 ня ен ь
SFX 1002 ня ен р
SFX 1002 ня ен ы
SFX 1002 ня ен и
SFX 1002 ня ен ш
SFX 1002 ня ен т
SFX 1002 ня ен е
SFX 1002 ня ен й
SFX 1002 ня ен в
SFX 1002 ня ен о
SFX 1002 ня ен а
SFX 1002 ня ен д

SFX 1003 Y 21
SFX 1003 0 а к
SFX 1003 0 а т
SFX 1003 0 а н
SFX 1003 0 а р
SFX 1003 0 а м
SFX 1003 0 а д
SFX 1003 0 а с
SFX 1003 0 а л
SFX 1003 0 а г
SFX 1003 0 а з
SFX 1003 0 а в
SFX 1003 0 а п
SFX 1003 0 а ф
SFX 1003 0 а ж
SFX 1003 0 а х
SFX 1003 0 а б
SFX 1003 0 а ч
SFX 1003 0 а ш
SFX 1003 0 а ё
SFX 1003 0 а ц
SFX 1003 0 а щ

SFX 1004 Y 21
SFX 1004 0 е к
SFX 1004 0 е т
SFX 1004 0 е н
SFX 1004 0 е р
SFX 1004 0 е м
SFX 1004 0 е д
SFX 1004 0 е с
SFX 1004 0 е л
SFX 1004 0 е г
SFX 1004 0 е з
SFX 1004 0 е в
SFX 1004 0 е п
SFX 1004 0 е ф
SFX 1004 0 е ж
SFX 1004 0 е х
SFX 1004 0 е б
SFX 1004 0 е ш
SFX 1004 0 е ч
SFX 1004 0 е ё
SFX 1004 0 е ц
SFX 1004 0 е щ

SFX 1005 Y 21
SFX 1005 0 у к
SFX 1005 0 у т
SFX 1005 0 у н
SFX 1005 0 у р
SFX 1005 0 у м
SFX 1005 0 у д
SFX 1005 0 у с
SFX 1005 0 у л
SFX 1005 0 у г
SFX 1005 0 у з
SFX 1005 0 у в
SFX 1005 0 у ф
SFX 1005 0 у п
SFX 1005 0 у ж
SFX 1005 0 у х
SFX 1005 0 у б
SFX 1005 0 у ш
SFX 1005 0 у ч
SFX 1005 0 у ё
SFX 1005 0 у ц
SFX 1005 0 у щ

SFX 1006 Y 20
SFX 1006 а е к
SFX 1006 а е ц
SFX 1006 а е н
SFX 1006 а е р
SFX 1006 а е м
SFX 1006 а е т
SFX 1006 а е д
SFX 1006 а е ш
SFX 1006 а е г
SFX 1006 а е л
SFX 1006 а е з
SFX 1006 а е в
SFX 1006 а е х
SFX 1006 а е б
SFX 1006 а е с
SFX 1006 а е ч
SFX 1006 а е п
SFX 1006 а е ж
SFX 1006 а е щ
SFX 1006 а е ф

SFX 1007 Y 20
SFX 1007 а ей к
SFX 1007 а ей ц
SFX 1007 а ей н
SFX 1007 а ей р
SFX 1007 а ей м
SFX 1007 а ей т
SFX 1007 а ей д
SFX 1007 а ей ш
SFX 1007 а ей г
SFX 1007 а ей л
SFX 1007 а ей з
SFX 1007 а ей в
SFX 1007 а ей х
SFX 1007 а ей б
SFX 1007 а ей с
SFX 1007 а ей ч
SFX 1007 а ей п
SFX 1007 а ей ж
SFX 1007 а ей щ
SFX 1007 а ей ф

SFX 1008 Y 20
SFX 1008 а ею к
SFX 1008 а ею ц
SFX 1008 а ею н
SFX 1008 а ею р
SFX 1008 а ею т
SFX 1008 а ею м
SFX 1008 а ею д
SFX 1008 а ею ш
SFX 1008 а ею г
SFX 1008 а ею л
SFX 1008 а ею з
SFX 1008 а ею в
SFX 1008 а ею х
SFX 1008 а ею б
SFX 1008 а ею с
SFX 1008 а ею ч
SFX 1008 а ею п
SFX 1008 а ею ж
SFX 1008 а ею щ
SFX 1008 а ею ф

SFX 1009 Y 20
SFX 1009 а и к
SFX 1009 а и ц
SFX 1009 а и н
SFX 1009 а и р
SFX 1009 а и м
SFX 1009 а и т
SFX 1009 а и л
SFX 1009 а и д
SFX 1009 а и ш
SFX 1009 а и г
SFX 1009 а и з
SFX 1009 а и в
SFX 1009 а и х
SFX 1009 а и б
SFX 1009 а и с
SFX 1009 а и ч
SFX 1009 а и п
SFX 1009 а и ж
SFX 1009 а и щ
SFX 1009 а и ф

SFX 1010 Y 20
SFX 1010 а ой к
SFX 1010 а ой ц
SFX 1010 а ой н
SFX 1010 а ой р
SFX 1010 а ой т
SFX 1010 а ой м
SFX 1010 а ой д
SFX 1010 а ой ш
SFX 1010 а ой г
SFX 1010 а ой л
SFX 1010 а ой з
SFX 1010 а ой в
SFX 1010 а ой х
SFX 1010 а ой б
SFX 1010 а ой с
SFX 1010 а ой ч
SFX 1010 а ой п
SFX 1010 а ой ж
SFX 1010 а ой щ
SFX 1010 а ой ф

SFX 1011 Y 20
SFX 1011 а ою к
SFX 1011 а ою ц
SFX 1011 а ою н
SFX 1011 а ою р
SFX 1011 а ою т
SFX 1011 а ою м
SFX 1011 а ою д
SFX 1011 а ою ш
SFX 1011 а ою г
SFX 1011 а ою л
SFX 1011 а ою з
SFX 1011 а ою в
SFX 1011 а ою х
SFX 1011 а ою б
SFX 1011 а ою с
SFX 1011 а ою ч
SFX 1011 а ою п
SFX 1011 а ою ж
SFX 1011 а ою щ
SFX 1011 а ою ф

SFX 1012 Y 20
SFX 1012 а у к
SFX 1012 а у ц
SFX 1012 а у н
SFX 1012 а у р
SFX 1012 а у м
SFX 1012 а у т
SFX 1012 а у д
SFX 1012 а у ш
SFX 1012 а у г
SFX 1012 а у л
SFX 1012 а у з
SFX 1012 а у в
SFX 1012 а у х
SFX 1012 а у б
SFX 1012 а у с
SFX 1012 а у ч
SFX 1012 а у п
SFX 1012 а у ж
SFX 1012 а у щ
SFX 1012 а у ф

SFX 1013 Y 20
SFX 1013 а ы к
SFX 1013 а ы ц
SFX 1013 а ы н
SFX 1013 а ы р
SFX 1013 а ы т
SFX 1013 а ы м
SFX 1013 а ы д
SFX 1013 а ы ш
SFX 1013 а ы г
SFX 1013 а ы л
SFX 1013 а ы з
SFX 1013 а ы в
SFX 1013 а ы х
SFX 1013 а ы б
SFX 1013 а ы с
SFX 1013 а ы ч
SFX 1013 а ы п
SFX 1013 а ы ж
SFX 1013 а ы щ
SFX 1013 а ы ф

SFX 1014 Y 20
SFX 1014 а 0 к
SFX 1014 а 0 ц
SFX 1014 а 0 н
SFX 1014 а 0 м
SFX 1014 а 0 р
SFX 1014 а 0 т
SFX 1014 а 0 д
SFX 1014 а 0 ш
SFX 1014 а 0 г
SFX 1014 а 0 л
SFX 1014 а 0 х
SFX 1014 а 0 в
SFX 1014 а 0 з
SFX 1014 а 0 с
SFX 1014 а 0 б
SFX 1014 а 0 п
SFX 1014 а 0 ч
SFX 1014 а 0 ж
SFX 1014 а 0 щ
SFX 1014 а 0 ф

SFX 1015 Y 20
SFX 1015 а 0 к
SFX 1015 а 0 ц
SFX 1015 а 0 н
SFX 1015 а 0 м
SFX 1015 а 0 р
SFX 1015 а 0 д
SFX 1015 а 0 т
SFX 1015 а 0 ш
SFX 1015 а 0 г
SFX 1015 а 0 л
SFX 1015 а 0 х
SFX 1015 а 0 з
SFX 1015 а 0 в
SFX 1015 а 0 б
SFX 1015 а 0 с
SFX 1015 а 0 п
SFX 1015 а 0 ч
SFX 1015 а 0 ж
SFX 1015 а 0 щ
SFX 1015 а 0 ф

SFX 1016 Y 20
SFX 1016 и ам к
SFX 1016 и ам л
SFX 1016 и ам и
SFX 1016 и ам н
SFX 1016 и ам ж
SFX 1016 и ам т
SFX 1016 и ам г
SFX 1016 и ам ш
SFX 1016 и ам х
SFX 1016 и ам ч
SFX 1016 и ам ь
SFX 1016 и ам р
SFX 1016 и ам щ
SFX 1016 и ам о
SFX 1016 и ам а
SFX 1016 и ам е
SFX 1016 и ам д
SFX 1016 и ам с

SFX 1017 Y 20
SFX 1017 и ами к
SFX 1017 и ами л
SFX 1017 и ами и
SFX 1017 и ами н
SFX 1017 и ами ж
SFX 1017 и ами т
SFX 1017 и ами г
SFX 1017 и ами ш
SFX 1017 и ами х
SFX 1017 и ами ч
SFX 1017 и ами ь
SFX 1017 и ами р
SFX 1017 и ами щ
SFX 1017 и ами о
SFX 1017 и ами а
SFX 1017 и ами е
SFX 1017 и ами д
SFX 1017 и ами с

SFX 1018 Y 20
SFX 1018 и ах к
SFX 1018 и ах л
SFX 1018 и ах и
SFX 1018 и ах н
SFX 1018 и ах ж
SFX 1018 и ах т
SFX 1018 и ах г
SFX 1018 и ах ш
SFX 1018 и ах х
SFX 1018 и ах ч
SFX 1018 и ах ь
SFX 1018 и ах р
SFX 1018 и ах щ
SFX 1018 и ах о
SFX 1018 и ах а
SFX 1018 и ах е
SFX 1018 и ах д
SFX 1018 и ах с

SFX 1019 Y 20
SFX 1019 и ям к
SFX 1019 и ям л
SFX 1019 и ям и
SFX 1019 и ям н
SFX 1019 и ям ж
SFX 1019 и ям т
SFX 1019 и ям г
SFX 1019 и ям ш
SFX 1019 и ям х
SFX 1019 и ям ч
SFX 1019 и ям ь
SFX 1019 и ям р
SFX 1019 и ям щ
SFX 1019 и ям о
SFX 1019 и ям а
SFX 1019 и ям е
SFX 1019 и ям д
SFX 1019 и ям с

SFX 1020 Y 20
SFX 1020 и ями к
SFX 1020 и ями л
SFX 1020 и ями и
SFX 1020 и ями н
SFX 1020 и ями ж
SFX 1020 и ями т
SFX 1020 и ями г
SFX 1020 и ями ш
SFX 1020 и ями х
SFX 1020 и ями ч
SFX 1020 и ями ь
SFX 1020 и ями р
SFX 1020 и ями щ
SFX 1020 и ями о
SFX 1020 и ями а
SFX 1020 и ями е
SFX 1020 и ями д
SFX 1020 и ями с

SFX 1021 Y 20
SFX 1021 и ях к
SFX 1021 и ях л
SFX 1021 и ях и
SFX 1021 и ях н
SFX 1021 и ях ж
SFX 1021 и ях т
SFX 1021 и ях г
SFX 1021 и ях ш
SFX 1021 и ях х
SFX 1021 и ях ч
SFX 1021 и ях ь
SFX 1021 и ях р
SFX 1021 и ях щ
SFX 1021 и ях о
SFX 1021 и ях а
SFX 1021 и ях е
SFX 1021 и ях д
SFX 1021 и ях с

SFX 1022 Y 20
SFX 1022 0 ам к
SFX 1022 0 ам т
SFX 1022 0 ам р
SFX 1022 0 ам н
SFX 1022 0 ам д
SFX 1022 0 ам с
SFX 1022 0 ам г
SFX 1022 0 ам л
SFX 1022 0 ам м
SFX 1022 0 ам п
SFX 1022 0 ам з
SFX 1022 0 ам ф
SFX 1022 0 ам в
SFX 1022 0 ам б
SFX 1022 0 ам х
SFX 1022 0 ам ч
SFX 1022 0 ам ж
SFX 1022 0 ам ш
SFX 1022 0 ам ц
SFX 1022 0 ам щ

SFX 1023 Y 20
SFX 1023 0 ами к
SFX 1023 0 ами т
SFX 1023 0 ами р
SFX 1023 0 ами н
SFX 1023 0 ами д
SFX 1023 0 ами с
SFX 1023 0 ами г
SFX 1023 0 ами л
SFX 1023 0 ами м
SFX 1023 0 ами з
SFX 1023 0 ами п
SFX 1023 0 ами ф
SFX 1023 0 ами в
SFX 1023 0 ами б
SFX 1023 0 ами х
SFX 1023 0 ами ч
SFX 1023 0 ами ж
SFX 1023 0 ами ш
SFX 1023 0 ами ц
SFX 1023 0 ами щ

SFX 1024 Y 20
SFX 1024 0 ах к
SFX 1024 0 ах т
SFX 1024 0 ах р
SFX 1024 0 ах н
SFX 1024 0 ах д
SFX 1024 0 ах с
SFX 1024 0 ах г
SFX 1024 0 ах л
SFX 1024 0 ах м
SFX 1024 0 ах з
SFX 1024 0 ах п
SFX 1024 0 ах ф
SFX 1024 0 ах в
SFX 1024 0 ах б
SFX 1024 0 ах х
SFX 1024 0 ах ч
SFX 1024 0 ах ж
SFX 1024 0 ах ш
SFX 1024 0 ах ц
SFX 1024 0 ах щ

SFX 1025 Y 20
SFX 1025 ный а н
SFX 1025 ный а ь
SFX 1025 ный а ч
SFX 1025 ный а т
SFX 1025 ный а в
SFX 1025 ный а д
SFX 1025 ный а р
SFX 1025 ный а з
SFX 1025 ный а ж
SFX 1025 ный а б
SFX 1025 ный а с
SFX 1025 ный а ш
SFX 1025 ный а й
SFX 1025 ный а м
SFX 1025 ный а п
SFX 1025 ный а щ
SFX 1025 ный а е
SFX 1025 ный а ё
SFX 1025 ный а ф

SFX 1026 Y 20
SFX 1026 ный ен н
SFX 1026 ный ен ь
SFX 1026 ный ен ч
SFX 1026 ный ен т
SFX 1026 ный ен д
SFX 1026 ный ен в
SFX 1026 ный ен р
SFX 1026 ный ен з
SFX 1026 ный ен ж
SFX 1026 ный ен б
SFX 1026 ный ен с
SFX 1026 ный ен ш
SFX 1026 ный ен м
SFX 1026 ный ен й
SFX 1026 ный ен п
SFX 1026 ный ен щ
SFX 1026 ный ен е
SFX 1026 ный ен ё
SFX 1026 ный ен ф

SFX 1027 Y 20
SFX 1027 ный о н
SFX 1027 ный о ь
SFX 1027 ный о ч
SFX 1027 ный о т
SFX 1027 ный о д
SFX 1027 ный о в
SFX 1027 ный о р
SFX 1027 ный о з
SFX 1027 ный о ж
SFX 1027 ный о б
SFX 1027 ный о ш
SFX 1027 ный о с
SFX 1027 ный о й
SFX 1027 ный о м
SFX 1027 ный о п
SFX 1027 ный о щ
SFX 1027 ный о е
SFX 1027 ный о ё
SFX 1027 ный о ф

SFX 1028 Y 20
SFX 1028 ный он н
SFX 1028 ный он ь
SFX 1028 ный он ч
SFX 1028 ный он т
SFX 1028 ный он д
SFX 1028 ный он в
SFX 1028 ный он р
SFX 1028 ный он з
SFX 1028 ный он ж
SFX 1028 ный он б
SFX 1028 ный он ш
SFX 1028 ный он с
SFX 1028 ный он й
SFX 1028 ный он м
SFX 1028 ный он п
SFX 1028 ный он щ
SFX 1028 ный он е
SFX 1028 ный он ё
SFX 1028 ный он ф

SFX 1029 Y 20
SFX 1029 ный ы н
SFX 1029 ный ы ь
SFX 1029 ный ы ч
SFX 1029 ный ы т
SFX 1029 ный ы д
SFX 1029 ный ы в
SFX 1029 ный ы р
SFX 1029 ный ы з
SFX 1029 ный ы ж
SFX 1029 ный ы ш
SFX 1029 ный ы с
SFX 1029 ный ы б
SFX 1029 ный ы й
SFX 1029 ный ы м
SFX 1029 ный ы п
SFX 1029 ный ы щ
SFX 1029 ный ы е
SFX 1029 ный ы ё
SFX 1029 ный ы ф

SFX 1030 Y 20
SFX 1030 ить ат р
SFX 1030 ить ат т
SFX 1030 ить ат л
SFX 1030 ить ат н
SFX 1030 ить ат д
SFX 1030 ить ат ч
SFX 1030 ить ат в
SFX 1030 ить ат с
SFX 1030 ить ат з
SFX 1030 ить ат ж
SFX 1030 ить ат ш
SFX 1030 ить ат п
SFX 1030 ить ат б
SFX 1030 ить ат м
SFX 1030 ить ат о
SFX 1030 ить ат щ
SFX 1030 ить ат е
SFX 1030 ить ат а
SFX 1030 ить ат ф

SFX 1031 Y 20
SFX 1031 ить лю т
SFX 1031 ить лю р
SFX 1031 ить лю л
SFX 1031 ить лю н
SFX 1031 ить лю д
SFX 1031 ить лю ч
SFX 1031 ить лю в
SFX 1031 ить лю с
SFX 1031 ить лю ж
SFX 1031 ить лю ш
SFX 1031 ить лю з
SFX 1031 ить лю п
SFX 1031 ить лю б
SFX 1031 ить лю м
SFX 1031 ить лю о
SFX 1031 ить лю щ
SFX 1031 ить лю е
SFX 1031 ить лю а
SFX 1031 ить лю ф

SFX 1032 Y 20
SFX 1032 ить у р
SFX 1032 ить у т
SFX 1032 ить у л
SFX 1032 ить у н
SFX 1032 ить у ч
SFX 1032 ить у д
SFX 1032 ить у в
SFX 1032 ить у с
SFX 1032 ить у ж
SFX 1032 ить у ш
SFX 1032 ить у п
SFX 1032 ить у з
SFX 1032 ить у б
SFX 1032 ить у м
SFX 1032 ить у о
SFX 1032 ить у щ
SFX 1032 ить у е
SFX 1032 ить у а
SFX 1032 ить у ф

SFX 1033 Y 20
SFX 1033 ить ю т
SFX 1033 ить ю р
SFX 1033 ить ю л
SFX 1033 ить ю н
SFX 1033 ить ю д
SFX 1033 ить ю ч
SFX 1033 ить ю в
SFX 1033 ить ю с
SFX 1033 ить ю ж
SFX 1033 ить ю ш
SFX 1033 ить ю з
SFX 1033 ить ю п
SFX 1033 ить ю б
SFX 1033 ить ю м
SFX 1033 ить ю о
SFX 1033 ить ю щ
SFX 1033 ить ю е
SFX 1033 ить ю а
SFX 1033 ить ю ф

SFX 1034 Y 20
SFX 1034 ить ят т
SFX 1034 ить ят р
SFX 1034 ить ят л
SFX 1034 ить ят н
SFX 1034 ить ят д
SFX 1034 ить ят ч
SFX 1034 ить ят в
SFX 1034 ить ят с
SFX 1034 ить ят ж
SFX 1034 ить ят ш
SFX 1034 ить ят п
SFX 1034 ить ят з
SFX 1034 ить ят б
SFX 1034 ить ят м
SFX 1034 ить ят о
SFX 1034 ить ят щ
SFX 1034 ить ят е
SFX 1034 ить ят а
SFX 1034 ить ят ф
